Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.315.185

Annual training.

To the extent funds are appropriated, the superintendent of public instruction, in cooperation with the educational service districts and the Washington state school directors' association, shall conduct an annual training meeting for the regional committees, educational service district superintendents, and local school district superintendents and boards of directors. Training may also be provided upon request.

[ 2006 c 263 s 509; 1999 c 315 s 303.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.